Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 319, O.S.L.
2022 (62 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 255), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 255. A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury
a special fund to be designated the "Statewide Recovery Fund". Said
fund shall be subject to legislative appropriation or transfer as
provided by law and shall consist of:
1. All such monies as the Legislature may direct to be
appropriated or transferred to said fund; and
2. All such monies received by the state after the effective
date of this act pursuant to the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021,
Public Law No. 117-2, Section 604 "Coronavirus Capital Projects
Fund" and Section 9901 "Coronavirus State and Local Recovery Funds",
less and except the funds dedicated to the Nonentitlement Units of
Local Government as described in the American Rescue Plan Act of
2021.

B. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, all
interest and income derived from deposits to the Statewide Recovery
Fund shall be credited to the Statewide Recovery Fund.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1124 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 18th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 1st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1124 Page 3